USR-to-hindi/apertium_hn_canonical_LC.dix
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a_h2"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
   
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>Ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ane</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cidZiyA/__n">
  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>M</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>M</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>  

<e lm="cidZiyA"><i>cidZiyA</i><par n="cidZiyA/__n"/></e>
